District of Columbia statutes.
26-1304

Organization certificate; execution; contents.

The persons referred to in § 26-1301 shall, under their hands and seals, execute before some officer in said District competent to take the acknowledgment of deeds, an organization certificate, which shall specifically state:

(1)

The name of the corporation;

(2)

The purposes for which it is formed;

(3)

The term for which it is to exist, which shall not exceed the term of 50 years, and be subject to alteration, amendment, or repeal by Congress at any time;

(4)

The number of its directors and the names and residences of the officers who for the first year are to manage the affairs of the company; and

(5)

The amount of its capital stock and its subdivision into shares.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1303, ch. 854, § 716
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 24(b), 44 DCR 1271
1981 Ed., § 26-404.
1973 Ed., § 26-304.